Colorado statutes. TITLE 14 Domestic Matters
PART 3
JUDICIAL PROCEDURE FOR GRANTING
CUSTODIAL RESPONSIBILITY DURING DEPLOYMENT

14-13.7-301. Definition.

In this part 3, "close and substantial relationship" means a relationship between a child and a nonparent who has had physical care of the child for more than one hundred eighty-two days.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire article added, (HB 13-1200), ch. 174, p. 630, § 2, effective May 10.

14-13.7-302. Proceeding for interim custody order.

After a deploying parent receives notice of deployment and until the deployment terminates, a court may issue an interim order, consistent with the best interests of the child, granting custodial responsibility, unless prohibited by the "Servicemembers Civil Relief Act", 50 U.S.C. appendix sections 521 and 522. A court may not issue a permanent order granting custodial responsibility without the consent of the deploying parent.

At any time after a deploying parent receives notice of deployment, either parent may file a motion regarding custodial responsibility of a child during deployment. The motion must be filed in a pending proceeding for custodial responsibility in a court with jurisdiction under section 14-13.7-104 or, if there is no pending proceeding in a court with jurisdiction under section 14-13.7-104, in a new action for granting custodial responsibility during deployment.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire article added, (HB 13-1200), ch. 174, p. 630, § 2, effective May 10.

14-13.7-303. Expedited hearing.

If a motion to grant custodial responsibility is filed under section 14-13.7-302 (2) before a deploying parent deploys, the court shall conduct an expedited hearing.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire article added, (HB 13-1200), ch. 174, p. 631, § 2, effective May 10.

14-13.7-304. Testimony by electronic means.

In a proceeding under this part 3, a party or witness who is not reasonably available to appear personally may appear, provide testimony, and present evidence by electronic means unless the court finds good cause to require a personal appearance.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire article added, (HB 13-1200), ch. 174, p. 631, § 2, effective May 10.

14-13.7-305. Effect of prior judicial order or agreement.

In a proceeding for a grant of custodial responsibility pursuant to this part 3, the following rules apply:

A prior judicial order designating custodial responsibility in the event of deployment is binding on the court unless the circumstances meet the requirements of law of this state other than this article for modifying a judicial order regarding custodial responsibility;

The court shall enforce a prior written agreement between the parents for designating custodial responsibility in the event of deployment, including an agreement executed under part 2 of this article, unless the court finds that the agreement is not in the best interest of the child.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire article added, (HB 13-1200), ch. 174, p. 631, § 2, effective May 10.

14-13.7-306. Grant of caretaking or decision-making authority to nonparent.

On motion of a deploying parent and in accordance with law of this state other than this article, if it is in the best interest of the child, a court may grant caretaking authority to a nonparent who is an adult family member of the child or an adult with whom the child has a close and substantial relationship.

Unless a grant of caretaking authority to a nonparent under subsection (1) of this section is agreed to by the other parent, the grant is limited to an amount of time not greater than:

The amount of time granted to the deploying parent under a permanent custody order, but the court may add unusual travel time necessary to transport the child; or

In the absence of a permanent custody order that is currently in effect, the amount of time that the deploying parent habitually cared for the child before being notified of deployment, but the court may add unusual travel time necessary to transport the child.

If a court finds that it is in the best interests of the child, the court may grant part of a deploying parent's decision-making authority, if the deploying parent is unable to exercise that authority, to a nonparent who is an adult family member of the child or an adult with whom the child has a close and substantial relationship. If a court grants the authority to a nonparent, the court shall specify the decision-making powers granted, including decisions regarding the child's education, religious training, health care, extracurricular activities, and travel.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire article added, (HB 13-1200), ch. 174, p. 631, § 2, effective May 10.

14-13.7-307. Grant of limited contact.

On a motion of a deploying parent, and in accordance with law of this state other than this article, unless the court finds that the contact would not be in the best interest of the child, a court shall grant limited contact to a nonparent who is a family member of the child or an individual with whom the child has a close and substantial relationship.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire article added, (HB 13-1200), ch. 174, p. 632, § 2, effective May 10.

14-13.7-308. Nature of authority created by interim custody order.

A grant of authority under this part 3 is an interim grant of authority and terminates under part 4 of this article after the return from deployment of the deploying parent, unless the grant has been terminated before that time by court order. The grant does not create an independent, continuing right to caretaking authority, decision-making authority, or limited contact in an individual to whom it is granted.

A nonparent granted caretaking authority, decision-making authority, or limited contact under this part 3 has standing to enforce the grant until it is terminated by court order or under part 4 of this article.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire article added, (HB 13-1200), ch. 174, p. 632, § 2, effective May 10.

14-13.7-309. Content of interim custody order.

An order granting custodial responsibility under this part 3 must:

Designate the order as an interim order; and

Identify to the extent feasible the destination, duration, and condition of the deployment.

If applicable, an order for custodial responsibility under this part 3 must:

Specify the allocation of caretaking authority, decision-making authority, or limited contact among the deploying parent, the other parent, and any nonparent;

If the order divides caretaking or decision-making authority between individuals, or grants caretaking authority to one individual and limited contact to another, provide a process to resolve any dispute that may arise;

Provide for liberal communication between the deploying parent and the child during deployment, including through electronic means, unless the court finds it is not in the best interest of the child, and allocate any costs of communications;

Provide for liberal contact between the deploying parent and the child during the time the deploying parent is on leave or otherwise available, unless the court finds it is not in the best interest of the child;

Provide for reasonable contact between the deploying parent and the child after return from deployment until the interim order is terminated, even if the time of contact exceeds the time the deploying parent spent with the child before entry of the interim order; and

Provide that the order will terminate pursuant to part 4 of this article after the deploying parent returns from deployment.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire article added, (HB 13-1200), ch. 174, p. 632, § 2, effective May 10.

14-13.7-310. Order for child support.

If a court has issued an order granting caretaking authority under this part 3, or an agreement granting caretaking authority has been executed under part 2 of this article, the court may enter an interim order for child support consistent with law of this state other than this article if the court has jurisdiction under the "Uniform Interstate Family Support Act", article 5 of this title.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire article added, (HB 13-1200), ch. 174, p. 633, § 2, effective May 10.

14-13.7-311. Modifying or terminating grant of custodial responsibility to nonparent.

Except for an order under section 14-13.7-305, except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section, and consistent with the "Servicemembers Civil Relief Act", 50 U.S.C. appendix sections 521 and 522, on motion of a deploying or other parent or any nonparent to whom caretaking authority, decision-making authority, or limited contact has been granted, the court may modify or terminate the grant if the modification or termination is consistent with this part 3 and it is in the best interest of the child. A modification is an interim modification and terminates pursuant to part 4 of this article after the deploying parent returns from deployment, unless the grant has been terminated before that time by court order.

On motion of a deploying parent, the court shall terminate a grant of limited contact, unless it is not in the best interests of the child.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire article added, (HB 13-1200), ch. 174, p. 633, § 2, effective May 10.